Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-364.18
Individuals with disabilities; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that individuals with disabilities, as defined in section 42-364, continue to face unfair, preconceived, and unnecessary societal biases as well as antiquated attitudes regarding their ability to successfully parent their children.

Laws 2018, LB845, § 16.